Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1911
Examiner, defined.

Examiner shall mean any polygraph examiner, voice analysis examiner, or any other person, other than an intern, who does any of the following:

(1) Purports to verify truthfulness or to detect deception or to provide a diagnostic opinion regarding such truthfulness or deception through instrumentation or the use of a mechanical device;

(2) Represents that he or she can or does offer the service of attempting to verify truthfulness or detect deception or providing a diagnostic opinion regarding such truthfulness or deception through instrumentation or the use of a mechanical device; or

(3) Uses instrumentation or a mechanical device to measure or record an individual's body responses or psychophysiological activities to enable or assist in the attempted verification of truthfulness or detection of deception or the providing of a diagnostic opinion regarding such truthfulness or deception.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 11.